Vermont statutes. Title 15A Adoption Act
Subchapter 6. Evaluation of Adoptee and Prospective Adoptive Parent

§ 3-601.
Evaluation during proceeding for adoption.

Not later than five business days after a complete petition for adoption of a minor is filed, the court shall order that an evaluation be made by:

a qualified employee of the agency that placed the minor for adoption; or

in a direct placement adoption, the person who made the placement evaluation or another person qualified under section 2-202 of this title.

The court shall provide the evaluator with a copy of the petition for adoption and copies of relevant items filed with the petition.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2017, No. 11

, § 49.

§ 3-602.
Content of post placement evaluation.

An evaluation shall be based on a personal interview with the petitioner in the petitioner’s residence and observation of the relationship between the minor adoptee and the petitioner.

An evaluation shall be in writing and contain:

an account of any change in the petitioner’s marital status or family history, physical or mental health, home environment, property, income, or financial obligations since the filing of the preplacement evaluation;

all reasonably available information concerning the physical, mental, and emotional condition of the minor adoptee which is not included in any report on the minor’s health, genetic, and social history filed in the proceeding for adoption;

copies of any court order, judgment, decree, or pending legal proceeding affecting the minor adoptee, the petitioner, or any child of the petitioner;

any behavior or characteristics of the petitioner which raise a concern, as described in subsection 2-204(a) of this title; and

a recommendation concerning the granting of the petition for adoption.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 3-603.
Time and filing of evaluation.

The evaluator shall complete a written evaluation and file it with the court within 60 days after receipt of the court’s order for an evaluation, unless the court for good cause allows a later filing.

If an evaluation produces a concern, as described in subsection 2-204(a) of this title, the evaluation shall be filed immediately and shall explain why the concern poses a risk of harm to the physical or psychological well-being of the minor.

An evaluator shall give the petitioner a copy of an evaluation when filed with the court and for two years shall retain a copy and a list of every source for each item of information in the evaluation.

A person who prepares an evaluation may charge a reasonable fee based on the time spent in conducting and writing the evaluation.

An evaluation fee is subject to review by the court.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.